Alaska, session 34, SB50.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 29.40.030(a) is amended to read: 04 (a) The comprehensive plan is a compilation of policy statements, goals, 05 standards, and maps for guiding the physical, social, and economic development, both 06 private and public, of the first or second class borough, and may include, but is not 07 limited to, the following: 08 (1) statements of policies, goals, and standards; 09 (2) a land use plan; 10 (3) a community facilities plan; 11 (4) a transportation plan; [AND] 12 (5) a housing development plan; and 13 (6) recommendations for implementation of the comprehensive plan. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.